District of Columbia statutes.
23-1911

No cause of action.

This subchapter does not create a cause of action or defense in favor of any person arising out of the failure to accord to a sexual assault victim the rights enumerated in § 23-1908 or the violation of any other provision of this subchapter.

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 101(c), 61 DCR 5913
Section 301 of D.C. Law 20-139 provided that the Mayor, pursuant to § 2-501 et seq., may issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.